Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1106
Development and production of geothermal resources; provisions applicable.

The development and production of geothermal resources shall be subject to Chapter 46, article 6, and the Environmental Protection Act and any rules and regulations adopted thereunder.

Laws 1982, LB 708, § 6.

Environmental Protection Act, see section 81-1532.